Massachusetts, session 194th, H1397.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended after section 244 by
adding the following section:
Section 255. (a) A provider of health care services owned by a private equity company as
defined by section 1 of chapter 6D, and licensed by the department that has refused to negotiate
in good faith to provide contracted services to a public or private payer shall not seek payment
from that payer for a non-contracted service in excess of 200 percent of the payer’s average
contracted reimbursement rate for that service.
(b) A violation of this section shall be an unfair or deceptive act or practice under chapter
93A.
of 1